zh-CN: 交通工具/汽车/飞机/船舶 > 交通工具零件/配件 > 机动车零部件 > 机动车地毯和垫衬物: 货物衬垫; 地毯套件; 控制台罩; 仪表盘罩; 门板; 车顶衬里; 后备箱垫; 内饰面料
de: Fahrzeuge & Teile > Fahrzeugersatzteile & -zubehör > Kfz-Teile > Bodenbeläge & Polster: Ladungsmatten; Teppich-Sets; Konsolenabdeckungen; Armaturenbrettabdeckungen; Türverkleidungen; Headliner; Kofferraummatten; Polsterstoff
fi: Ajoneuvot ja osat > Ajoneuvojen osat ja tarvikkeet > Moottoriajoneuvojen osat > Moottoriajoneuvojen matot ja verhoilut: Rahtitiivisteet; Mattosarjat; Konsolisuojat; Kojelautasuojat; Ovipaneelit; Päätiivisteet; Tavaratilan matot; Verhoilukankaat
ru: Транспортные средства, запчасти и аксессуары > Запчасти и аксессуары для транспортных средств > Автомобильные запчасти > Автомобильные коврики и обивка салона: Чехлы и накидки для багажника; Наборы ковриков; Чехлы для подлокотников; Накидки для передней панели; Обивка дверей; Обивка потолка; Коврики для багажника; Обивочная ткань
sv: Fordon och delar > Fordonsdelar och tillbehör > Fordonsdelar > Bilmattor och bilklädsel: Lastutrymmesfoder; Mattset; Konsolskydd; Instrumentbrädesöverdrag; Dörrpaneler; Bilinnertakfoder; Bakluckesmattor; Sätesöverdragsmaterial
vi: Xe và phụ tùng > Bộ phận và phụ kiện xe cộ > Phụ tùng xe cơ giới > Bọc ghế và thảm trải sàn xe cơ giới: Lớp lót cốp xe; Bộ thảm sàn xe; Nắp đậy bảng điều khiển; Vỏ bọc bàn vô lăng; Bảng điều khiển trên cửa; Trần xe; Thảm lót cốp xe; Vải bọc
ro-RO: Vehicule și piese > Piese și accesorii pentru vehicule > Piese autovehicule > Covoare și tapițerie pentru autovehicule: Inserții mărfuri; Seturi covoare; Huse console; Huse bord; Panouri portiere; Material plafon; Covorașe portbagaj; Material tapițerie
es: Vehículos y recambios > Piezas y accesorios para vehículos > Piezas para vehículos motorizados > Tapicería y alfombrillas para vehículos motorizados: Revestimientos de carga; Kits de alfombras; Cubiertas de consola; Cubiertas de salpicadero; Paneles de puerta; Cabeceras; Alfombrillas para maletero; Tejido de tapicería
ja: 乗り物・パーツ > 乗り物用パーツ・関連用品 > 自動車・バイク用パーツ > 自動車内装用ファブリック: カーゴライナー; カーペットキット; コンソールカバー; ダッシュカバー; ドアパネル; ヘッドライナー; トランクマット; 布張り
nl: Voertuigen en onderdelen > Voertuigonderdelen en -accessoires > Motorvoertuigonderdelen > Vloerbedekking en bekleding voor motorvoertuigen: Bekleding voor laadruimtes; Vloerbedekkingskits; Hoezen voor consoles; Hoezen voor dashboards; Panelen voor deuren; Hemelbekleding; Matten voor kofferbakken; Bekledingsstof
pt-PT: Veículos e peças > Acessórios e peças para veículos > Peças para veículos motorizados > Alcatifa e estofos para veículos motorizados: Revestimentos de carga; Kits de alcatifa; Capas de consola; Capas para tablier; Painéis de portas; Revestimentos superiores; Tapetes para porta-malas; Tecido para estofados
th: รถยนต์และชิ้นส่วน > ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์สำหรับยานยนต์ > ชิ้นส่วนรถยนต์ > พรมและเบาะรถ: เบาะรองส่วนบรรทุก; ชุดพรม; เบาะคอนโซล; เบาะหน้าปัด; แผงประตู; แนวเหนือหัว; เสื่อท้ายรถ; ผ้าคลุมหุ้มเบาะ
zh-TW: 車輛與零配件 > 車輛零件/配件 > 汽機車零配件 > 車內鋪毯/布墊: 車用防污墊; 地毯工具包; 控制台蓋; 儀表板防塵套; 門板; 車頂內襯; 後車廂墊; 內裝布料
nb: Kjøretøy og deler > Deler og tilbehør til kjøretøy > Kjøretøydeler > Tepper i kjøretøy: Bagasjetrekk; Teppesett; Konsolltrekk; Dashbordtrekk; Dørpaneler; Taktrekk; Bagasjeromsmatter; Møbelstoff
en: Vehicles & Parts > Vehicle Parts & Accessories > Motor Vehicle Parts > Motor Vehicle Carpet & Upholstery: Cargo Liners; Carpet Kits; Console Covers; Dash Covers; Door Panels; Headliners; Trunk Mats; Upholstery Fabric
ko: 차량/부품 > 차량 부품/부대용품 > 자동차 부품 > 자동차 카펫/실내 커버: 화물칸 깔개; 카펫 키트; 콘솔 커버; 대시보드 커버; 도어 패널; 내부 천장; 트렁크 매트; 실내 커버 패브릭
hu: Járművek és alkatrészek > Járműalkatrészek és -kiegészítők > Gépjárműalkatrészek > Gépjármű-szőnyegek és -kárpitok: Csomagtérborítók; Szőnyegkészletek; Konzolburkolatok; Műszerfalburkolatok; Ajtópanelek; Tetőkárpitok; Csomagtartó-szőnyegek; Kárpitos szövet
it: Veicoli e parti > Componenti e accessori per auto > Componenti per veicoli a motore > Tappetini e rivestimenti per veicoli a motore: Navi da carico; Kit tappeto; Coperture per console; Coperture per cruscotto; Pannelli porte; Headliner; Tappetini per bagagliaio; Tessuto da tappezzeria
el: Οχήματα & ανταλλακτικά > Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ οχημάτων > Ανταλλακτικά μηχανοκίνητων οχημάτων > Χαλιά και επενδύσεις μηχανοκίνητων οχημάτων: Επενδύσεις χώρου αποσκευών; Σετ χαλιών; Καλύμματα κονσόλας; Καλύμματα ταμπλό; Πλαϊνά πόρτας; Εσωτερικές οροφές; Πατάκια πορτμπαγκάζ; Ύφασμα Ταπετσαρίας
sk-SK: Diely pre vozidlá > Diely a príslušenstvo pre vozidlá > Diely motorových vozidiel > Koberce a čalúnenie motorových vozidiel: Podložky do kufra auta; Súpravy koberčekov; Kryty konzol; Kryty palubnej dosky; Panely dverí; Poťahy stropu karosérie; Rohože do kufra; Poťahová látka
pt-BR: Veículos e peças > Peças e acessórios de veículos > Peças para veículos motorizados > Tapetes e estofados para veículos motorizados: Forros de carga; Kits de carpete; Capas de console; Capas de painel; Painéis de portas; Forros de teto; Tapetes de porta-malas; Tecido para estofamento
tr: Taşıtlar ve Parçalar > Taşıt Parçaları ve Aksesuarlar > Motorlu Taşıt Parçaları > Motorlu Taşıt Halı ve Döşemesi: Kargo Torbaları; Halı Setleri; Konsol Kapakları; Gösterge Paneli Kapakları; Kapı Panelleri; Tavan Döşemeleri; Gövde Paspasları; Döşemelik Kumaş
da: Køretøjer og dele > Dele og tilbehør til køretøjer > Dele til motorkøretøjer > Måtter og sæder til motorkøretøjer: Lastrumsmåtter; Tæppesæt; Konsoldæksler; Dashboard-dæksler; Dørpaneler; Hovedlister; Bagagemåtter; Sædepolstring
cs: Vozidla a náhradní díly > Díly a příslušenství vozidel > Díly motorových vozidel > Koberce a čalounění vozidel: Vložky nákladového prostoru; Sady koberců; Potahy na středové konzoly; Kryty palubní desky; Dveřní panely; Stropní čalounění; Rohože do kufru; Čalounická tkanina
hr-HR: Vozila i dijelovi vozila > Dijelovi i oprema za vozila > Dijelovi za motorna vozila > Tepisi i presvlake za motorna vozila: Presvlake za prtljažnik; Kompleti za tepih; Navlake za kontrolne ploče; Navlake za nadzorne ploče; Paneli za vrata; Krovni oblozi; Tepisi za prtljažnik; Tkanina presvlake
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės ir dalys > Transporto priemonių dalys ir priedai > Motorinių transporto priemonių dalys > Motorinių transporto priemonių kilimai ir apmušalai: Krovininių skyriaus paklotai; Kilimų rinkiniai; Konsolės uždangalai; Prietaisų skydelio uždangalai; Durelių skydeliai; Stogo apmušalai; Bagažinės kilimėliai; Apmušalų audinys
pl: Pojazdy i części > Akcesoria i części do pojazdów > Części do pojazdów silnikowych > Wykładziny i tapicerka: Wykładziny ładunkowe; Zestawy dywanowe; Pokrowce na konsole; Pokrowce na deskę rozdzielczą; Panele drzwiowe; Podsufitki; Maty do bagażnika; Tkanina tapicerska
bg-BG: Превозни средства и части > Автомобилни части и аксесоари > Части за моторни превозни средства > Мокет и тапицерия за моторни превозни средства: Подложки за багаж; Комплекти килими; Калъфи за подлакътник; Покривала за табло; Панели за врати; Автомобилни тавани; Стелки за багажник; Плат за тапицерия
fr: Véhicules et accessoires > Pièces détachées pour véhicules > Pièces détachées automobiles et motos > Housses et tapis pour véhicules: Doublures de coffre; Kits de tapis; Housses de console; Housses de tableau de bord; Panneaux de porte; Ciels de toit; Tapis de coffre; Tissu d'ameublement
sl-SI: Vozila in deli > Deli in dodatki za vozila > Deli za motorna vozila > Čistila za preproge in sedeže vozil: Obloge za prtljažnik; Kompleti preprog; Zaščitne prevleke za konzole; Zaščitne prevleke za armaturne plošče; Notranje obloge vrat; Stropne obloge; Podloge za prtljažnik; Tkanine za oblazinjenje